Illinois, session 104th, HB4811.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 522-101 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-101 new)7    Sec. 22-101. High school start time. No public high school 8shall have a start time earlier than 8:30 a.m.